Colorado, session 2026A, HB1105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-3-135 as
follows:
25-3-135. Adoption option for pregnant person - definitions.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, IF A
PREGNANT PERSON PRESENTS TO A HEALTH-CARE FACILITY REQUESTING
AN ABORTION, THE PERSON'S HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, OR ANOTHER
WILLING HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER AT THE HEALTH-CARE FACILITY, SHALL,
AT LEAST TWENTY-FOUR HOURS PRIOR TO AN ABORTION PROCEDURE BEING
PERFORMED FOR THE PERSON AT THE HEALTH-CARE FACILITY, DISCUSS
WITH THE PERSON THE AVAILABILITY OF ADOPTION AS A PREGNANCY
OUTCOME OPTION AND THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION ABOUT ADOPTIVE
PLACEMENT:
(a) THE AVAILABILITY OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR PRENATAL
CARE, CHILD BIRTH, AND NEONATAL CARE EXPENSES;
(b) THE DISTINCTION BETWEEN ADOPTION THROUGH THE CHILD
WELFARE SYSTEM AND PRIVATE ADOPTION;
(c) A BRIEF OVERVIEW OF THE ASSESSMENT AND APPROVAL
PROCESS FOR ADOPTIVE PARENTS IN A PRIVATE ADOPTION;
(d) THE OPTION FOR A BIRTH PARENT TO DESIGNATE SPECIFIC
APPLICANTS AS POTENTIAL ADOPTIVE PARENTS;
(e) THE CONFIDENTIALITY OPTIONS AVAILABLE TO VARIOUS
PARTIES FOR A RELINQUISHMENT AND SUBSEQUENT ADOPTION OF A CHILD;
AND
(f) A DESCRIPTION OF IMMEDIATE AND LONG-TERM MENTAL
HEALTH OUTCOMES FOR BIRTH PARENTS WHO PURSUE ADOPTIVE
-2- HB26-1105

PLACEMENT AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO AN ABORTION.
(2) (a) THE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER SHALL PRESENT THE
INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(a) TO (1)(f) OF THIS
SECTION TO A PREGNANT PERSON IN AN OBJECTIVE AND UNBIASED
MANNER, USING PLAIN LANGUAGE, AND IN A PRIVATE SETTING.
(b) THE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE PREGNANT
PERSON WITH:
(I) AN ADEQUATE OPPORTUNITY TO ASK QUESTIONS AND RECEIVE
ANSWERS THAT THE PREGNANT PERSON CAN UNDERSTAND; AND
(II) AN OPPORTUNITY TO DECLINE TO DISCUSS THE INFORMATION
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(a) TO (1)(f) OF THIS SECTION AT ANY
POINT FOLLOWING A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER'S INITIAL MENTION OF THE
AVAILABILITY OF ADOPTION AS A PREGNANCY OUTCOME OPTION.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ABORTION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25-6-402.
(b) "HEALTH-CARE FACILITY" MEANS A FACILITY LICENSED OR
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-1.5-103.
(c) "HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER" MEANS A PHYSICIAN, NURSE
PRACTITIONER, REGISTERED NURSE, ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED
NURSE, CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFE, GENETIC COUNSELOR, PHYSICIAN'S
ASSISTANT, SOCIAL WORKER, OR OTHER STAFF MEMBER OF A HEALTH-CARE
FACILITY WHO IS KNOWLEDGEABLE ABOUT THE STATE'S ADOPTION
PROCESSES AND LOCAL RESOURCES.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
-3- HB26-1105

ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1105